District of Columbia statutes.
31-5041.10

Violations of the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act.

The Commissioner or Attorney General for the District of Columbia may bring an action to enjoin or seek remedies for violations of RESPA.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2131, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2131 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).